sk-SK: Kompatibilný profil pacienta: Priemerný; Bariatrický; Geriatrický; Novorodenecký; Pediatrický; Univerzálny; Iné
th: โปรไฟล์ผู้ป่วยที่เข้ากันได้: เฉลี่ย; สำหรับคนอ้วน; เวชศาสตร์ผู้สูงอายุ; ทารกแรกเกิด; สำหรับเด็ก; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
da: Kompatibel patientprofil: Gennemsnit; Bariatrisk; Geriatrisk; Neonatal; Pædiatrisk; Universal; Andet
sv: Kompatibel patientprofil: Genomsnitt; Bariatrisk; Geriatrisk; Neonatal; Pediatrisk; Universell; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilan profil pacijenta: Prosječni; Barijatrijski; Gerijatrijski; Neonatalni; Pedijatrijski; Univerzalna; Ostalo
nl: Compatibel patiëntprofiel: Gemiddeld; Bariatrisch; Geriatrisch; Neonataal; Pediatrisch; Universeel; Andere
el: Συμβατό προφίλ ασθενούς: Μέσος; Βαριατρική; Γηριατρικός; Νεογνό; Παιδιατρικός; Universal; Άλλο
pt-BR: Perfil de paciente compatível: Média; Bariátrica; Geriátrico; Neonatal; Pediátrica; Universal; Outro
fi: Yhteensopiva potilasprofiili: Keskiverto; Bariatrinen; Geriatrinen; Vastasyntynyt; Pediatrinen; Yleinen; Muu
fr: Profil patient compatible: Moyenne; Bariatrique; Gériatrique; Néonatal; Pédiatrique; Universel; Autre
it: Profilo del paziente compatibile: Media; Bariatrica; Geriatrico; Neonatale; Pediatrica; Universale; Altro
es: Perfil de paciente compatible: Promedio; Bariátrico; Geriátrico; Neonatal; Pediátrico; Universal; Otros
lt-LT: Suderinamas paciento profilis: Vidutinis; Bariatrinis; Geriatrinis; Naujagimis; Vaikas; Universalus; Kita
en: Compatible patient profile: Average; Bariatric; Geriatric; Neonatal; Pediatric; Universal; Other
pt-PT: Perfil de paciente compatível: Média; Bariátrico; Geriatria; Neonatal; Pediátrico; Universal; Outro
ko: 호환 가능한 환자 프로필: 평균; 비만; 노인; 신생아; 소아과; 범용; 기타
tr: Uyumlu hasta profili: Ortalama; Bariatrik; Geriatrik; Yenidoğan; Pediyatrik; Her türden mekana uygun; Diğer
zh-CN: 适用患者资料: 平均; 肥胖患者轮椅; 老年医学; 新生儿; 儿童用; 通用; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместим профил на пациента: Среден; Бариатричен; Гериатричен; Неонатален; Педиатричен; Универсален; Други
hu: Kompatibilis betegprofil: Átlagos; Túlsúlyos; Idős; Újszülött; Gyermek; Általános; Egyéb
zh-TW: 相容的病患資料: 平均; 肥胖症專用; 老年醫學; 新生兒; 兒童成長; 通用; 其他
nb: Kompatibel pasientprofil: Gjennomsnitt; Bariatrisk; Geriatrisk; Neonatal; Pediatrisk; Universal; Annet
sl-SI: Združljiv profil bolnika: Povprečni; Bariatrični; Geriatrični; Neonatalni; Pediatrični; Univerzalno; Drugo
ro-RO: Profil pacient compatibil: Obișnuit; Bariatric; Geriatric; Neonatal; Pediatric; Universală; Altele
ru: Совместимая группа пациентов: Средний; Бариатрический; Гериатрический; Неонатальный; Педиатрический; Универсальный; Другой
pl: Zgodny profil pacjenta: Średnio; Bariatryczny; Geriatryczny; Noworodkowy; Pediatria; Uniwersalny; Inne
de: Kompatibles Patientenprofil: Durchschnitt; Bariatrisch; Geriatrisch; Neugeborene; Pädiatrisch; Universell; Sonstiges
ja: 使用可能な患者のプロフィール: 平均; 肥満者用; 老年者; 新生児; 小児用; ユニバーサル; その他
vi: Bệnh án tương thích: Trung bình; Xe lăn cho bệnh nhân béo phì; Lão khoa; Sơ sinh; Xe lăn cho bệnh nhi; Phổ biến; Khác
cs: Kompatibilní profil pacienta: Průměrná; Bariatrické; Geriatrický; Novorozenecký; Pediatrické; Univerzální; Jiné